Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-224.09
Merger, consolidation, reinsurance; appeal.

Any party aggrieved by any order of the director approving or disapproving any contract of merger, consolidation, or bulk reinsurance may appeal, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1957, c. 180, § 9, p. 624;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 11, p. 1272;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 42.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.